dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="চীন__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="loc"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="loc"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ের
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="loc"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="mf"/>
            <s n="top"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বার্ন__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ের
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="চীন">
      <i>
        চীন
      </i>
      <par n="চীন__np_mf"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="বার্ন">
      <i>
        বার্ন
      </i>
      <par n="বার্ন__np_m"/>
    </e>
